Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.245.060

Director of skill centers.

To the extent funds are available, the superintendent of public instruction shall assign at least one full-time equivalent staff position within the office of the superintendent of public instruction to serve as the director of skill centers.

[ 2009 c 578 s 7; 2007 c 463 s 7.]